New York, session 2025-2026, S5563.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 34-b to read as follows: 3 § 34-b. Examination of industrial development agencies and not-for- 4 profit corporations by county comptrollers. 1. Examination of industrial 5 development agency projects and actions by county comptrollers. (a) A 6 county comptroller may conduct an audit of a project and/or action of an 7 industrial development agency located within the county. 8 (b) In counties where there is no county comptroller, the chief 9 elected official of the county shall designate the budget director or 10 finance director to undertake such audits. 11 (c) For purposes of this section, industrial development agencies 12 include such public authorities defined in paragraph (c) of subdivision 13 two of section two of the public authorities law. 14 2. Examination of not-for-profit corporations by county comptrollers. 15 (a) A county comptroller may conduct an audit of a not-for-profit corpo- 16 ration affiliated with, sponsored by, or created by a county, city, town 17 or village government, located within the county. 18 (b) In counties where there is no county comptroller, the chief 19 elected official of the county shall designate the budget director or 20 finance director to undertake such audits. 21 (c) For purposes of this section, not-for-profit corporations include 22 such public authorities defined in paragraph (b) of subdivision two of 23 section two of the public authorities law. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 25 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01384-01-5